Nevada, session 83, AB470.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 687B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in NRS 687B.225 and sections 2 to 14,
inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in sections 3 to 9, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Adverse determination” means a determination by a
health carrier that an admission, availability of care, continued
stay or other medical care or dental care that is a covered benefit
has been reviewed and, based upon the information provided, does
not meet the health carrier’s requirements for medical necessity,
appropriateness, health care setting, level of care or effectiveness,
and the requested care or service or payment for the care or
service is therefore denied, reduced or terminated.
Sec. 4. “Health carrier” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.024, and includes, without limitation:
1. An organization for dental care, as defined in NRS
695D.060; and
2. A utilization review organization, as defined in
NRS 695G.085.
Sec. 5. “Insured” means a policyholder, subscriber, enrollee
or other person covered by a health carrier.
Sec. 6. “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 695G.055.
Sec. 7. “Network” means a defined set of providers of health
care who are under contract with a health carrier to provide
health care services pursuant to a network plan offered or issued
by the health carrier.
Sec. 8. “Network plan” means a contract or policy of
insurance offered by a health carrier under which the financing
and delivery of medical or dental care is provided, in whole or in
part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
health carrier.
Sec. 9. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695G.070.
-
*AB470*

– 4 –
Sec. 10. 1. If a health carrier is considering making an
adverse determination on a request for prior authorization on the
basis that the medical or dental care involved in the request is not
medically necessary, the health carrier that received the request
shall:
(a) Immediately notify the provider of health care who
submitted the request that the medical necessity of the requested
care is being questioned by the health carrier; and
(b) Offer the provider of health care an opportunity to speak
with a person responsible for making the determination over the
telephone or by videoconference to discuss the clinical issues
involved in the request before the health carrier renders an initial
determination on the request.
2. Upon rendering an adverse determination on a request for
prior authorization, a health carrier shall immediately transmit to
the insured to whom the request pertains a written notice that
contains:
(a) A specific description of all reasons that the health carrier
made the adverse determination;
(b) A description of any documentation that the health carrier
requested from the insured or a provider of health care of the
insured and did not receive or deemed insufficient, if the failure to
receive sufficient documentation contributed to the adverse
determination; and
(c) A statement that the insured has the right to appeal the
adverse determination.
Sec. 11. 1. If a health carrier approves a request for prior
authorization, the approval remains valid, including for any
changes in the dosage of a medication:
(a) Until 12 months after the date on which the request is
approved; or
(b) If the approval is for the treatment of a chronic or long
term condition, for the length of the treatment and for any
subsequent treatments of the same type and for the same
condition.
2. A health carrier shall not revoke or impose an additional
limit, condition or restriction on a request for prior authorization
that the health carrier has previously approved unless:
(a) The care at issue in the request was not provided to the
insured within 45 business days after the date on which the health
carrier received the request;
(b) The health carrier determines that an insured or a provider
of health care procured the approval by fraud or material
misrepresentation; or
-
*AB470*

– 5 –
(c) The health carrier determines that the care at issue in the
request was not covered by the health carrier at the time the care
was provided.
3. A health carrier that has approved a request for prior
authorization shall not deny or refuse to promptly pay a claim for
the approved medical or dental care unless the health carrier
determines that the insured or provider of health care procured
the prior authorization by fraud or material misrepresentation.
The claim must be paid at the same rate that the health carrier is
contractually obligated to or would ordinarily pay a provider of
health care for providing the specific type of care that was
approved and provided to the insured.
4. Within the first 90 days of the coverage period for an
insured, a health carrier shall honor a request for prior
authorization that has been approved by a health carrier or other
entity that previously provided the insured with coverage for
medical or dental care if:
(a) The approval was issued within the 12 months immediately
preceding the first day of the coverage period under the current
contract or policy of insurance; and
(b) The specific medical or dental care included within the
request is not affirmatively excluded under the terms and
conditions of the contract or policy of insurance issued by the
health carrier.
5. As used in this section, “coverage period” means the
current term of a contract or policy of insurance issued by a
health carrier.
Sec. 12. 1. A health carrier shall not require prior
authorization for emergency services covered by the health
carrier, including, without limitation, where applicable,
transportation by ambulance to a hospital or other medical
facility.
2. If a health carrier requires an insured or his or her
provider of health care to notify the health carrier that the insured
has been admitted to a hospital to receive emergency services or
has received emergency services, the health carrier shall not
require an insured or a provider of health care to transmit such a
notice earlier than the end of the business day immediately
following the day after the date on which the insured was admitted
or the emergency services were provided, as applicable.
3. A health carrier shall not deny coverage for emergency
services covered by the health carrier that are medically necessary.
Emergency services are presumed to be medically necessary if,
within 72 hours after an insured is admitted to receive emergency
services, the insured’s provider of health care transmits to the
-
*AB470*

– 6 –
health carrier a certification, in writing, that the condition of the
insured required emergency services. The health carrier may rebut
that presumption by establishing, by clear and convincing
evidence, that the emergency services were not medically
necessary.
4. A health carrier shall make all determinations for whether
emergency services are medically necessary without regard to
whether a provider of health care that provided or billed for those
services participates in the network of the health carrier.
5. For emergency services which require immediate post
evaluation or post stabilization services, a health carrier shall
approve or make an adverse determination on any request for
prior authorization for the post evaluation or post stabilization
services submitted by or on behalf of the insured within 1 hour of
the time the health carrier receives the request.
6. As used in this section, “emergency services” means health
care services that are provided by a provider of health care to
screen and to stabilize an insured after the sudden onset of a
medical condition that manifests itself by symptoms of such
sufficient severity that a prudent person would believe that the
absence of immediate medical attention could result in:
(a) Serious jeopardy to the health of the insured;
(b) Serious jeopardy to the health of an unborn child of the
insured;
(c) Serious impairment of a bodily function of the insured; or
(d) Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part of the
insured.
Sec. 13. 1. If a health carrier violates NRS 687B.225 or
section 10, 11 or 12 of this act with respect to a particular request
for prior authorization, the request shall be deemed approved.
2. Nothing in NRS 687B.225 or section 10, 11 or 12 of this
act shall be construed to require a health carrier to provide
coverage:
(a) For medical or dental care that, regardless of whether such
care is medically necessary, would not be a covered benefit under
the terms and conditions of the contract or policy of insurance;
(b) To a person who is not insured by the health carrier on the
date on which medical or dental care is provided to the person; or
(c) To an insured who, as a result of his or her failure to pay
the applicable premiums required under the terms and conditions
of a contract or policy of insurance, has no coverage under the
contract or policy on the date on which medical or dental care is
provided to the insured.
Sec. 14. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, a
health carrier shall publish on an Internet website maintained by
-
*AB470*

– 7 –
the health carrier in an easily accessible format the following
information for the immediately preceding calendar year, in
aggregated form for all requests for prior authorization received
by the insurer during the immediately preceding year and
disaggregated in accordance with subsection 2:
(a) The percentage of requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care in this State that were approved upon initial
review;
(b) The percentage of requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care in this State that resulted in an adverse
determination upon initial review;
(c) The percentage of the adverse determinations described in
paragraph (b) that were appealed;
(d) The percentage of appeals of adverse determinations
described in paragraph (c) that resulted in a reversal of the
adverse determination;
(e) The five most common reasons for the adverse
determinations described in paragraph (b); and
(f) The average time between a request for prior authorization
for medical or dental care in this State and the resolution of the
request.
2. The information described in subsection 1 must be
disaggregated for the following categories:
(a) The specialty of the provider of health care who submitted
a request for prior authorization; and
(b) The types of health or dental care at issue in the request for
prior authorization, including, without limitation, the specific
types of prescription drugs, procedures or diagnostic tests involved
in the requests.
3. A health carrier shall not include individually identifiable
health information in the information published pursuant to
subsection 1.
4. As used in this section, “individually identifiable health
information” means information relating to the provision of
health care to an insured:
(a) That specifically identifies the insured; or
(b) For which there is a reasonable basis to believe that the
information can be used to identify the insured.
Sec. 15. NRS 687B.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
687B.225 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.0405, 689A.0412, 689A.0413, 689A.0418, 689A.0437,
689A.044, 689A.0445, 689A.0459, 689B.031, 689B.0312,
689B.0313, 689B.0315, 689B.0317, 689B.0319, 689B.0374,
689B.0378, 689C.1665, 689C.1671, 689C.1675, 689C.1676,
695A.1843, 695A.1856, 695A.1865, 695A.1874, 695B.1912,
-
*AB470*

– 8 –
695B.1913, 695B.1914, 695B.1919, 695B.19197, 695B.1924,
695B.1925, 695B.1942, 695C.1696, 695C.1699, 695C.1713,
695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743, 695C.1745, 695C.1751,
695G.170, 695G.1705, 695G.171, 695G.1714, 695G.1715,
695G.1719 and 695G.177, and section 12 of this act, any contract
[for group, blanket or individual health] or policy of insurance [or
any contract by a nonprofit hospital, medical or dental service
corporation or organization for dental care] issued by a health
carrier which provides for payment of a certain part of medical or
dental care may require the insured [or member] to obtain prior
authorization for that care from the [insurer or organization. The
insurer or organization] health carrier in a manner consistent with
this section and sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this act.
2. A health carrier that requires an insured to obtain prior
authorization shall:
(a) File its procedure for obtaining [approval of care] prior
authorization pursuant to this section , including, without
limitation, a list of the specific goods and services for which the
health carrier requires prior authorization and the clinical review
criteria used by the health carrier to evaluate requests for prior
authorization, for approval by the Commissioner . [; and]
(b) Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a specific
statute, including, without limitation, NRS 689A.0446, 689B.0361,
689C.1688, 695A.1859, 695B.19087, 695C.16932 and 695G.1703,
[respond to] and except as otherwise provided by paragraph (c),
approve or make an adverse determination on any request for
[approval by the insured or member] prior authorization submitted
by or on behalf of the insured pursuant to this section [within 20
days after it receives the request.] and notify the insured and his or
her provider of health care of the approval or adverse
determination:
(1) For medical or dental care that is not urgent health
care, within 48 hours after receiving the request.
(2) For urgent health care, within 24 hours after receiving
the request.
(c) If the health carrier requires additional, medically relevant
information or documentation in order to adequately evaluate a
request for prior authorization:
(1) Notify the insured and the provider of health care who
submitted the request within the applicable amount of time
described in paragraph (b) that additional information is required
to evaluate the request;
(2) Include within the notification sent pursuant to
subparagraph (1) a description, with reasonable specificity, of the
-
*AB470*

– 9 –
information that the health carrier requires to make a
determination on the request for prior authorization; and
(3) Approve or make an adverse determination on the
request:
(I) For medical or dental care that is not urgent health
care, within 48 hours after receiving the information.
(II) For urgent health care, within 24 hours after
receiving the information.
[2.] 3. The procedure for prior authorization may not
discriminate among persons licensed to provide the covered care.
4. If a health carrier seeks to amend its procedure for
obtaining prior authorization, including, without limitation,
changing the goods and services for which the health carrier
requires prior authorization or changing the clinical review
criteria used by the health carrier, the health carrier:
(a) Must file a request to amend the procedure for approval by
the Commissioner.
(b) May not allow the amended procedure to take effect until:
(1) The Commissioner notifies the health carrier that the
request is approved; and
(2) The health carrier satisfies the requirements of
subsection 5 after the health carrier receives a notice of approval
from the Commissioner.
5. A change to a health carrier’s procedure for obtaining
prior authorization may not take effect until:
(a) The health carrier transmits a notice that contains a
summary of the changes to the procedure to each of its insureds
and providers of health care who participate in the network of the
health carrier;
(b) The health carrier updates the information published on its
Internet website pursuant to subsection 6 to reflect the amended
procedure for obtaining prior authorization and the date on which
the amended procedure takes effect; and
(c) At least 60 days have passed after the later of:
(1) The date on which the health carrier transmitted the
notice to its insureds and providers of health care who participate
in the network of the health carrier pursuant to paragraph (a); or
(2) The date on which the health carrier updated the
information published on its Internet website pursuant to
paragraph (b).
6. A health carrier shall publish its procedures for obtaining
prior authorization, including, without limitation, the clinical
review criteria, on its Internet website:
(a) Using clear language that is understandable to an ordinary
layperson, where practicable; and
-
*AB470*

– 10 –
(b) In a place that is readily accessible and conspicuous to
insureds and the public.
7. A health carrier shall not deny a claim based on the failure
of an insured to obtain prior authorization for medical or dental
care if the procedure for obtaining prior authorization established
by the health carrier did not require the insured to obtain prior
authorization for that medical or dental care on the date that the
medical or dental care was provided to the insured.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Clinical review criteria” means any written screening
procedure, decision abstract, clinical protocol or practice
guideline used by the health carrier to determine the necessity and
appropriateness of medical or dental care.
(b) “Emergency services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 12 of this act.
(c) “Urgent health care”:
(1) Means health care that, in the opinion of a provider of
health care with knowledge of an insured’s medical condition, if
not rendered to the insured within 48 hours could:
(I) Seriously jeopardize the life or health of the insured
or the ability of the insured to regain maximum function; or
(II) Subject the insured to severe pain that cannot be
adequately managed without receiving such care.
(2) Does not include emergency services.
Sec. 16. NRS 695B.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.320 1. Nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporations are subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the
provisions of chapters 679A and 679B of NRS, subsections 2, 4, 17,
18 and 30 of NRS 680B.010, NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060,
inclusive, chapter 681B of NRS, NRS 686A.010 to 686A.315,
inclusive, 686B.010 to 686B.175, inclusive, 687B.010 to
687B.040, inclusive, 687B.070 to 687B.140, inclusive, 687B.150,
687B.160, 687B.180, 687B.200 to 687B.255, inclusive, and
sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this act, 687B.270, 687B.310 to
687B.380, inclusive, 687B.410, 687B.420, 687B.430, 687B.500 and
chapters 692B, 692C, 693A and 696B of NRS, to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of this
chapter.
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporation is included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
Sec. 17. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
-
*AB470*

– 11 –
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
sections 21 to 33, inclusive, of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to
432.133, inclusive, 432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to
444.430, inclusive, and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all
other provisions of law relating to the functions of the divisions of
the Department, but is not responsible for the clinical activities of
the Division of Public and Behavioral Health or the professional line
activities of the other divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
-
*AB470*

– 12 –
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 18. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
-
*AB470*

– 13 –
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 2 of
NRS 687B.225, subsections 1, 3, 5, 6 and 7 of NRS 687B.225,
687B.352, 687B.408, 687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805,
689B.030 to 689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs (b) and (c) of
subsection 1 of NRS 689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6 and 7 of NRS
689B.0319, 689B.033 to 689B.0369, inclusive, 689B.0375 to
689B.050, inclusive, 689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287 and
689B.500 and sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this act apply to
coverage provided pursuant to this paragraph, except that the
provisions of NRS 689B.0378, 689B.03785 and 689B.500 only
apply to coverage for active officers and employees of the
governing body, or the dependents of such officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
-
*AB470*

– 14 –
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 19. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, paragraphs (b) and (c) of
subsection 2 of NRS 687B.225, subsections 1, 3, 5, 6 and 7 of NRS
687B.225, 687B.352, 687B.409, 687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725,
687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255, 695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155,
695G.160, 695G.162, 695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645,
695G.1665, 695G.167, 695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712,
inclusive, 695G.1714 to 695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177,
695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive,
695G.405 and 695G.415, and sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this act
in the same manner as an insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57
of NRS is required to comply with those provisions.
Sec. 20. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 21 to 33, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 21. 1. The provisions of sections 22 to 33, inclusive, of
this act and any policies developed pursuant thereto do not apply
to the delivery of services to recipients of Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program through managed care in
accordance with NRS 422.273.
-
*AB470*

– 15 –
2. A health maintenance organization or other managed care
organization that enters into a contract with the Department or the
Division pursuant to NRS 422.273 to provide health care services
to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program shall comply with NRS
687B.225 and sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 22. As used in sections 22 to 33, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 23 to 26, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 23. “Adverse determination” means a determination by
the Department that an admission, availability of care, continued
stay or other medical care or dental care that is a covered benefit
has been reviewed and, based upon the information provided, does
not meet the Department’s requirements for medical necessity,
appropriateness, health care setting, level of care or effectiveness,
and the requested care or service or payment for the care or
service is therefore denied, reduced or terminated.
Sec. 24. “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.055.
Sec. 25. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695G.070.
Sec. 26. “Recipient” means a natural person who receives
benefits through Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program, as applicable.
Sec. 27. 1. The Department, with respect to Medicaid and
the Children’s Health Insurance Program, shall establish written
procedures for obtaining prior authorization for medical or dental
care which must include, without limitation:
(a) A list of the specific goods and services for which the
Department requires prior authorization; and
(b) A description of the clinical review criteria used by the
Department.
2. The Department shall publish the written procedures for
obtaining prior authorization established by the Department
pursuant to subsection 1, including, without limitation, the clinical
review criteria, on an Internet website maintained by the
Department:
(a) Using clear language that is understandable to an ordinary
layperson, where practicable; and
(b) In a place that is readily accessible and conspicuous to
recipients and the public.
3. If the Department amends the procedure for obtaining
prior authorization adopted pursuant to subsection 1, including,
without limitation, changing the goods and services for which the
-
*AB470*

– 16 –
Department requires prior authorization or changing the clinical
review criteria used by the Department, the Department shall:
(a) Transmit a notice containing a summary of the changes
made to the procedure to each recipient and each provider of
goods or services under Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, as applicable; and
(b) Update the information published on its Internet website
pursuant to subsection 2 to reflect the amended procedure for
obtaining prior authorization and the date on which the amended
procedure takes effect.
4. A change to the Department’s procedure for obtaining
prior authorization may not take effect until 60 days have passed
after the later of:
(a) The date on which the Department transmitted the notice to
recipients and providers of goods or services under Medicaid or
the Children’s Health Insurance Program, as applicable, pursuant
to paragraph (a) of subsection 3; or
(b) The date on which the Department updated the
information published on its Internet website pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 3.
5. The Department shall not deny a claim based on the
failure of a recipient to obtain prior authorization for medical or
dental care if the procedure for obtaining prior authorization
established by the Department pursuant to this section did not
require the recipient to obtain prior authorization for that medical
or dental care on the date that the medical or dental care was
provided to the recipient.
6. As used in this section, “clinical review criteria” means
any written screening procedure, decision abstract, clinical
protocol or practice guideline used by the Department to
determine the necessity and appropriateness of medical or dental
care.
Sec. 28. 1. Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a
specific statute, and except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the Department, with respect to Medicaid and the Children’s
Health Insurance Program, shall approve or make an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization submitted by or
on behalf of a recipient and notify the recipient and his or her
provider of health care of the approval or adverse determination:
(a) For medical or dental care that is not urgent health care,
within 48 hours after receiving the request.
(b) For urgent health care, within 24 hours after receiving the
request.
-
*AB470*

– 17 –
2. If the Department requires additional, medically relevant
information or documentation in order to adequately evaluate a
request for prior authorization, the Department shall:
(a) Notify the recipient and the provider of health care who
submitted the request within the applicable amount of time
described in subsection 1 that additional information is required to
evaluate the request;
(b) Include within the notification sent pursuant to paragraph
(a) a description, with reasonable specificity, of the information
that the Department requires to make a determination on the
request for prior authorization; and
(c) Approve or make an adverse determination on the request:
(1) For medical or dental care that is not urgent health
care, within 48 hours after receiving the information.
(2) For urgent health care, within 24 hours after receiving
the information.
3. As used in this section, “urgent health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 15 of this act.
Sec. 29. 1. If the Department is considering making an
adverse determination on a request for prior authorization on the
basis that the medical or dental care involved in the request is not
medically necessary, the Department shall:
(a) Immediately notify the provider of health care who
submitted the request that the medical necessity of the requested
care is being questioned by the Department; and
(b) Offer the provider of health care an opportunity to speak
with a person responsible for making the determination over the
telephone or by videoconference to discuss the clinical issues
involved in the request before the physician or dentist renders an
initial determination on the request.
2. Upon rendering an adverse determination on a request for
prior authorization, the Department shall immediately transmit to
the recipient to whom the request pertains a written notice that
contains:
(a) A specific description of all reasons that the Department
made the adverse determination;
(b) A description of any documentation that the Department
requested from the recipient or a provider of health care of the
recipient and did not receive or deemed insufficient, if the failure
to receive sufficient documentation contributed to the adverse
determination; and
(c) A statement that the recipient has the right to appeal the
adverse determination.
-
*AB470*

– 18 –
Sec. 30. 1. If the Department approves a request for prior
authorization, the approval remains valid, including for any
changes in the dosage of a medication:
(a) Until 12 months after the date on which the request is
approved; or
(b) If the approval is for the treatment of a chronic or long
term condition, for the length of the treatment and for any
subsequent treatments of the same type and for the same
condition.
2. The Department shall not revoke or impose an additional
limit, condition or restriction on a request for prior authorization
that the Department has previously approved unless:
(a) The care at issue in the request was not provided to the
recipient within 45 business days after the date on which the
Department received the request;
(b) The Department determines that a recipient or a provider
of health care procured the approval by fraud or material
misrepresentation; or
(c) The Department determines that the care at issue in the
request was not covered by Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, as applicable, at the time the care was
provided.
3. If the Department has approved a request for prior
authorization, the Department shall not deny or refuse to promptly
pay a claim for the approved medical or dental care unless the
Department determines that the recipient or provider of health
care procured the prior authorization by fraud or material
misrepresentation. The claim must be paid at the same rate that
the Department is contractually obligated to or would ordinarily
pay a provider of health care for providing the specific type of care
that was approved and provided to the recipient.
4. Within the first 90 days that a recipient is enrolled in
Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program, as
applicable, the Department shall honor a request for prior
authorization that has been approved by a health carrier or other
entity that previously provided the recipient with coverage for
medical or dental care if:
(a) The approval was issued within the 12 months immediately
preceding the first day of the enrollment of the recipient; and
(b) The specific medical or dental care included within the
request is not affirmatively excluded under the terms and
conditions of Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program, as applicable.
-
*AB470*

– 19 –
5. As used in this section, “health carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 695G.024 and includes, without limitation,
an organization for dental care.
Sec. 31. 1. The Department, with respect to Medicaid and
the Children’s Health Insurance Program, shall not require prior
authorization for covered emergency services, including, without
limitation, where applicable, transportation by ambulance to a
hospital or other medical facility.
2. If the Department requires a recipient or his or her
provider of health care to notify the Department that the recipient
has been admitted to a hospital to receive emergency services or
has received emergency services, the Department shall not require
a recipient or a provider of health care to transmit such a notice
earlier than the end of the business day immediately following the
day after the date on which the recipient was admitted or the
emergency services were provided, as applicable.
3. The Department shall not deny coverage for emergency
services covered by Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program that are medically necessary. Emergency services are
presumed to be medically necessary if, within 72 hours after a
recipient is admitted to receive emergency services, the recipient’s
provider of health care transmits to the Department a certification,
in writing, that the condition of the recipient required emergency
services. The Department may rebut that presumption by
establishing, by clear and convincing evidence, that the emergency
services were not medically necessary.
4. For emergency services which require immediate post
evaluation or post stabilization services, the Department shall
approve or make an adverse determination on any request for
prior authorization for the post evaluation or post stabilization
services submitted by or on behalf of the insured within 1 hour of
the time the Department receives the request.
5. As used in this section, “emergency services” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 12 of this act.
Sec. 32. 1. If the Department violates sections 27 to 31,
inclusive, of this act with respect to a particular request for prior
authorization, the request shall be deemed approved.
2. Nothing in sections 27 to 31, inclusive, of this act shall be
construed to require the Department to provide coverage:
(a) For medical or dental care that, regardless of whether such
care is medically necessary, would not be a covered benefit under
the terms and conditions of Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, as applicable; or
(b) To a person who is not a recipient or is not otherwise
eligible to receive coverage under Medicaid or the Children’s
-
*AB470*

– 20 –
Health Insurance Program, as applicable, on the date on which
medical or dental care is provided to the person.
Sec. 33. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, the
Department shall publish on an Internet website maintained by
the Department in an easily accessible format the following
information for the immediately preceding calendar year, in
aggregated form for all requests for prior authorization received
by the insurer during the immediately preceding year and
disaggregated in accordance with subsection 2:
(a) The percentage of requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care that were approved upon initial review;
(b) The percentage of requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care that resulted in an adverse determination
upon initial review;
(c) The percentage of the adverse determinations described in
paragraph (b) that were appealed;
(d) The percentage of appeals of adverse determinations
described in paragraph (c) that resulted in a reversal of the
adverse determination;
(e) The five most common reasons for the adverse
determinations described in paragraph (b); and
(f) The average time between a request for prior authorization
for medical or dental care in this State and the resolution of the
request.
2. The information described in subsection 1 must be
disaggregated for the following categories:
(a) The specialty of the provider of health care who submitted
a request for prior authorization; and
(b) The types of health or dental care at issue in the request for
prior authorization, including, without limitation, the specific
types of prescription drugs, procedures or diagnostic tests involved
in the requests.
3. The Department shall not include individually identifiable
health information in the information published pursuant to
subsection 1.
4. As used in this section, “individually identifiable health
information” means information relating to the provision of
health care to an insured:
(a) That specifically identifies the insured; or
(b) For which there is a reasonable basis to believe that the
information can be used to identify the insured.
Sec. 34. NRS 422.403 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.403 1. The Department shall, by regulation, establish and
manage the use by the Medicaid program of step therapy and prior
authorization for prescription drugs.
-
*AB470*

– 21 –
2. The Drug Use Review Board shall:
(a) Advise the Department concerning the use by the Medicaid
program of step therapy and prior authorization for prescription
drugs;
(b) Develop step therapy protocols and prior authorization
policies and procedures that comply with the provisions of sections
22 to 33, inclusive, of this act for use by the Medicaid program for
prescription drugs; and
(c) Review and approve, based on clinical evidence and best
clinical practice guidelines and without consideration of the cost of
the prescription drugs being considered, step therapy protocols used
by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
3. The step therapy protocol established pursuant to this section
must not apply to a drug approved by the Food and Drug
Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric condition of a
recipient of Medicaid, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in Medicaid is located 60 miles or more from
the residence of the recipient; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the recipient, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
4. The Department shall not require the Drug Use Review
Board to develop, review or approve prior authorization policies or
procedures necessary for the operation of the list of preferred
prescription drugs developed pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
5. The Department shall accept recommendations from the
Drug Use Review Board as the basis for developing or revising step
therapy protocols and prior authorization policies and procedures
used by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
-
*AB470*

– 22 –
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires a
recipient of Medicaid to use a prescription drug or sequence of
prescription drugs other than a drug that a practitioner recommends
for treatment of a psychiatric condition of the recipient before
Medicaid provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 35. NRS 608.1555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.1555 Any employer who provides benefits for health care
to his or her employees shall provide the same benefits and pay
providers of health care in the same manner as a policy of insurance
pursuant to chapters 689A and 689B of NRS, including, without
limitation, as required by paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 2 of
NRS 687B.225, subsections 1, 3, 5, 6 and 7 of NRS 687B.225,
NRS 687B.409, 687B.723 and 687B.725 [.] and sections 2 to 14,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 36. 1. The amendatory provisions of this act do not
apply to a request for prior authorization submitted:
(a) Under a contract or policy of health insurance issued before
October 1, 2025, but apply to any request for prior authorization
submitted under any renewal of such a contract or policy.
(b) To the Department of Health and Human Services before
October 1, 2025, for medical or dental care provided to a recipient
of Medicaid.
2. A health carrier must, in order to continue requiring prior
authorization in contracts or policies of health insurance issued or
renewed after October 1, 2025:
(a) Develop a procedure for obtaining prior authorization that
complies with NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 15 of this act,
and sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this act; and
(b) Obtain the approval of the Commissioner of Insurance
pursuant to NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 15 of this act, for
the procedure developed pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. As used in this section, “health carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 37. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 38. 1. This section and section 36 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 35, inclusive, and 37 of this act become
effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
-
*AB470*

– 23 –
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act and
approving procedures for obtaining prior authorization pursuant to
NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 15 of this act, and section 36
of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB470*